Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.060

Powers and duties of commission.

It shall be the duty of the civil service commission:

(1) To make suitable rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions hereof. Such rules and regulations shall provide in detail the manner in which examinations may be held, and appointments, promotions, reallocations, transfers, reinstatements, demotions, suspensions, and discharges shall be made, and may also provide for any other matters connected with the general subject of personnel administration, and which may be considered desirable to further carry out the general purposes of this chapter, or which may be found to be in the interest of good personnel administration. The rules and regulations and any amendments thereof shall be printed, mimeographed, or multigraphed for free public distribution. Such rules and regulations may be changed from time to time.

(2) To give practical tests which shall consist only of subjects which will fairly determine the capacity of persons examined to perform duties of the position to which appointment is to be made. Such tests may include tests of physical fitness or manual skill or both.

(3) To make investigations concerning and report upon all matters touching the enforcement and effect of the provisions of this chapter, and the rules and regulations prescribed hereunder; to inspect all departments, offices, places, positions, and employments affected by this chapter, and ascertain whether this chapter and all such rules and regulations are being obeyed. Such investigations may be made by the commission or by any commissioner designated by the commission for that purpose. Not only must these investigations be made by the commission as aforesaid, but the commission must make like investigation on petition of a citizen, duly verified, stating that irregularities or abuses exist, or setting forth in concise language, in writing, the necessity for such investigation. In the course of such investigation the commission or designated commissioner, or chief examiner, may administer oaths, subpoena and require the attendance of witnesses and the production by them of books, papers, documents, and accounts appertaining to the investigation and also cause the deposition of witnesses residing within or without the state to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for like depositions in civil actions in the superior court; and the oaths administered and the subpoenas issued hereunder shall have the same force and effect as the oaths administered and subpoenas issued by a superior court judge in his or her judicial capacity; and the failure of any person so subpoenaed to comply with the provisions of this section shall be deemed a violation of this chapter, and punishable as such.

(4) To conduct hearings and investigations in accordance with this chapter and by the rules of practice and procedure adopted by the commission, and in the conduct thereof neither the commission, nor designated commissioner shall be bound by technical rules of evidence. No informality in any proceedings or hearing, or in the manner of taking testimony before the commission or designated commissioner, shall invalidate any order, decision, rule, or regulation made, approved, or confirmed by the commission: PROVIDED, That no order, decision, rule, or regulation made by any designated commissioner conducting any hearing or investigation alone shall be of any force or effect whatsoever unless and until concurred in by at least one of the other two members.

(5) To hear and determine appeals or complaints respecting the allocation of positions, the rejection of an examinee, and such other matters as may be referred to the commission.

(6) To provide for, formulate, and hold competitive tests to determine the relative qualifications of persons who seek employment in any class or position and as a result thereof establish eligible lists for the various classes of positions, and provide that persons laid off, or who have accepted voluntary demotion in lieu of layoff, because of curtailment of expenditures, reduction in force, and for like causes, head the list in the order of their seniority, to the end that they shall be the first to be reemployed or reinstated in their former job class.

(7) To certify to the appointing authority, when a vacant position is to be filled, on written request, the names of the five persons highest on the eligible list for the class. If there is no such list, to authorize a provisional or temporary appointment list for such class. A temporary appointment expires after four months. However, the appointing authority may extend the temporary appointment beyond the four-month period up to one year if the commission continues to advertise and test for the position. If, after one year from the date the initial temporary appointment was first made, there are less than five persons on the eligible list for the class, then the appointing authority may fill the position with any person or persons on the eligible list.

(8) To keep such records as may be necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.

[ 2020 c 14 s 1; 2012 c 117 s 12; 2001 c 232 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 153 s 2; 1959 c 1 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]